District of Columbia statutes.
2-205.02

Payment of fire insurance.

No District of Columbia appropriation shall be used for the payment of premiums or other cost of fire insurance.

June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 533, ch. 300, § 12
1981 Ed., § 1-1119.
1973 Ed., § 1-816a.